Washington statutes.
RCW 2.36.054

Jury source list—Master jury list—Creation.

Unless otherwise specified by rule of the supreme court, the jury source list and master jury list for each county shall be created as provided by this section.

(1) The superior court of each county, after consultation with the county clerk and county auditor of that jurisdiction, shall annually notify Washington technology solutions not later than March 1st of each year of its election to use either a jury source list that is merged by the county or a jury source list that is merged by Washington technology solutions. Washington technology solutions shall annually furnish at no charge to the superior court of each county a separate list of the registered voters residing in that county as supplied annually by the secretary of state and a separate list of driver's license and identicard holders residing in that county as supplied annually by the department of licensing, or a merged list of all such persons residing in that county, in accordance with the annual notification required by this subsection. The lists provided by Washington technology solutions shall be in an electronic format mutually agreed upon by the superior court requesting it and Washington technology solutions. The annual merger of the list of registered voters residing in each county with the list of licensed drivers and identicard holders residing in each county to form a jury source list for each county shall be in accordance with the standards and methodology established in this chapter or by superseding court rule whether the merger is accomplished by Washington technology solutions or by a county.

(2)(a) Persons on the lists of registered voters and driver's license and identicard holders shall be identified by a minimum of last name, first name, middle initial where available, date of birth, gender, and county of residence. Identifying information shall be used when merging the lists to ensure to the extent reasonably possible that persons are only listed once on the merged list. Conflicts in addresses are to be resolved by using the most recent record by date of last vote in a general election, date of driver's license or identicard address change or date of voter registration.

(b) After July 1, 2024, persons who:

(i) Apply for a driver's license or identicard in this state shall have the ability to opt in to allow the department of licensing to share the person's email address with Washington technology solutions for the purpose of electronically receiving jury summons and other communications related to jury service; and

(ii) Apply online to register to vote shall, immediately after completing the voter registration transaction, be directed by the secretary of state to a website where the person shall have the ability to opt in to share the person's email address with Washington technology solutions for the purpose of electronically receiving jury summons and other communications related to jury service. The provisions of this subsection (2)(b)(ii) are subject to appropriation.

(3) Washington technology solutions shall provide counties that elect to receive a jury source list merged by Washington technology solutions with a list of names which are possible duplicates that cannot be resolved based on the identifying information required under subsection (2) of this section. If a possible duplication cannot subsequently be resolved satisfactorily through reasonable efforts by the county receiving the merged list, the possible duplicate name shall be stricken from the jury source list until the next annual jury source list is prepared.

[ 2024 c 54 s 21; 2023 c 316 s 4; 2015 c 225 s 1; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 812; 1993 c 408 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Severability—1993 c 408: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1993 c 408 s 14.]

Effective dates—1993 c 408: "(1) Sections 1, 2, 3, 6, 8, and 13 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1993.

(2) Sections 10 and 12 of this act shall take effect March 1, 1994.

(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect September 1, 1994." [ 1993 c 408 s 15.]